Illinois, session 104th, SB1381.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.88 and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)7    Sec. 10-20.88. Library materials database; restriction on 8student's access to library materials.9    (a) A school board shall require a school that operates a 10library to place the library's catalog of library materials in 11a searchable database accessible over the Internet to a parent 12or guardian of a student at the school.13    (b) A school board shall require a school that operates a 14library to allow a parent or guardian of a student at the 15school to prohibit the student from accessing any library 16materials that the parent or guardian designates. The school 17shall require the parent or guardian to designate in writing 18which library materials the parent or guardian is prohibiting 19the student from accessing, shall keep the written designation 20on file in the library, and shall prevent the student from 21accessing that material. 22    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)  SB1381- 2 -LRB104 06544 LNS 16580 b1    Sec. 34-18.88. Library materials database; restriction on 2student's access to library materials. 3    (a) The board shall require a school that operates a 4library to place the library's catalog of library materials in 5a searchable database accessible over the Internet to a parent 6or guardian of a student at the school.7    (b) The board shall require a school that operates a 8library to allow a parent or guardian of a student at the 9school to prohibit the student from accessing any library 10materials that the parent or guardian designates. The school 11shall require the parent or guardian to designate in writing 12which library materials the parent or guardian is prohibiting 13the student from accessing, shall keep the written designation 14on file in the library, and shall prevent the student from 15accessing that material.